language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 275 Y 12
SFX 275 0 a .
SFX 275 0 ach .
SFX 275 0 am .
SFX 275 0 ami .
SFX 275 0 e .
SFX 275 0 eju .
SFX 275 0 oma .
SFX 275 0 ow .
SFX 275 0 owu .
SFX 275 0 u .
SFX 275 0 y .
SFX 275 0 ym .
SFX 276 Y 30
SFX 276 0 a .
SFX 276 0 ach .
SFX 276 0 am .
SFX 276 0 ami .
SFX 276 0 e .
SFX 276 0 i .
SFX 276 0 ijo .
SFX 276 0 ijom .
SFX 276 0 ijomej .
SFX 276 0 ijomy .
SFX 276 0 ijotej .
SFX 276 0 ijośo .
SFX 276 0 ijoš .
SFX 276 0 iju .
SFX 276 0 im .
SFX 276 0 imej .
SFX 276 0 imy .
SFX 276 0 itej .
SFX 276 0 iśo .
SFX 276 0 iš .
SFX 276 0 mej .
SFX 276 0 my .
SFX 276 0 oju .
SFX 276 0 om .
SFX 276 0 oma .
SFX 276 0 ow .
SFX 276 0 owu .
SFX 276 0 tej .
SFX 276 0 u .
SFX 276 0 ćo .
SFX 277 Y 28
SFX 277 0 a .
SFX 277 0 e .
SFX 277 0 eg .
SFX 277 0 ego .
SFX 277 0 ej .
SFX 277 0 eje .
SFX 277 0 eju .
SFX 277 0 em .
SFX 277 0 emu .
SFX 277 0 i .
SFX 277 0 ijo .
SFX 277 0 ijom .
SFX 277 0 ijomej .
SFX 277 0 ijomy .
SFX 277 0 ijotej .
SFX 277 0 ijośo .
SFX 277 0 ijoš .
SFX 277 0 iju .
SFX 277 0 imej .
SFX 277 0 imy .
SFX 277 0 itej .
SFX 277 0 iśo .
SFX 277 0 u .
SFX 277 0 y .
SFX 277 0 ych .
SFX 277 0 ym .
SFX 277 0 yma .
SFX 277 0 ymi .
SFX 278 Y 10
SFX 278 0 a .
SFX 278 0 ach .
SFX 278 0 am .
SFX 278 0 ami .
SFX 278 0 oju .
SFX 278 0 om .
SFX 278 0 oma .
SFX 278 0 owu .
SFX 278 0 u .
SFX 278 0 y .
SFX 279 Y 26
SFX 279 0 a .
SFX 279 0 ach .
SFX 279 0 achmej .
SFX 279 0 achmy .
SFX 279 0 achu .
SFX 279 0 am .
SFX 279 0 ami .
SFX 279 0 ašo .
SFX 279 0 aštej .
SFX 279 0 ašćo .
SFX 279 0 e .
SFX 279 0 mej .
SFX 279 0 my .
SFX 279 0 oma .
SFX 279 0 ow .
SFX 279 0 owu .
SFX 279 0 tej .
SFX 279 0 u .
SFX 279 0 y .
SFX 279 0 ym .
SFX 279 0 ymej .
SFX 279 0 ymy .
SFX 279 0 ytej .
SFX 279 0 yśo .
SFX 279 0 yš .
SFX 279 0 ćo .
SFX 280 Y 25
SFX 280 0 ach .
SFX 280 0 achmej .
SFX 280 0 achmy .
SFX 280 0 achu .
SFX 280 0 am .
SFX 280 0 ami .
SFX 280 0 ašo .
SFX 280 0 aštej .
SFX 280 0 ašćo .
SFX 280 0 e .
SFX 280 0 mej .
SFX 280 0 my .
SFX 280 0 oma .
SFX 280 0 ow .
SFX 280 0 owu .
SFX 280 0 tej .
SFX 280 0 u .
SFX 280 0 y .
SFX 280 0 ym .
SFX 280 0 ymej .
SFX 280 0 ymy .
SFX 280 0 ytej .
SFX 280 0 yśo .
SFX 280 0 yš .
SFX 280 0 ćo .
SFX 281 Y 10
SFX 281 0 a .
SFX 281 0 ach .
SFX 281 0 am .
SFX 281 0 ami .
SFX 281 0 oju .
SFX 281 0 om .
SFX 281 0 oma .
SFX 281 0 ow .
SFX 281 0 owu .
SFX 281 0 u .
SFX 282 Y 10
SFX 282 0 a .
SFX 282 0 ach .
SFX 282 0 am .
SFX 282 0 ami .
SFX 282 0 oju .
SFX 282 0 om .
SFX 282 0 oma .
SFX 282 0 ow .
SFX 282 0 owu .
SFX 282 0 u .
SFX 283 Y 11
SFX 283 0 a .
SFX 283 0 ach .
SFX 283 0 am .
SFX 283 0 ami .
SFX 283 0 e .
SFX 283 0 oju .
SFX 283 0 om .
SFX 283 0 oma .
SFX 283 0 ow .
SFX 283 0 owu .
SFX 283 0 u .
SFX 284 Y 11
SFX 284 0 a .
SFX 284 0 ach .
SFX 284 0 am .
SFX 284 0 ami .
SFX 284 0 e .
SFX 284 0 oju .
SFX 284 0 om .
SFX 284 0 oma .
SFX 284 0 ow .
SFX 284 0 owu .
SFX 284 0 u .
SFX 285 Y 11
SFX 285 0 a .
SFX 285 0 ach .
SFX 285 0 am .
SFX 285 0 ami .
SFX 285 0 i .
SFX 285 0 oju .
SFX 285 0 om .
SFX 285 0 oma .
SFX 285 0 ow .
SFX 285 0 owu .
SFX 285 0 u .
SFX 286 Y 11
SFX 286 0 a .
SFX 286 0 ach .
SFX 286 0 am .
SFX 286 0 ami .
SFX 286 0 i .
SFX 286 0 oju .
SFX 286 0 om .
SFX 286 0 oma .
SFX 286 0 ow .
SFX 286 0 owu .
SFX 286 0 u .
SFX 287 Y 11
SFX 287 0 a .
SFX 287 0 ach .
SFX 287 0 am .
SFX 287 0 ami .
SFX 287 0 oju .
SFX 287 0 om .
SFX 287 0 oma .
SFX 287 0 ow .
SFX 287 0 owu .
SFX 287 0 u .
SFX 287 0 y .
SFX 288 Y 11
SFX 288 0 a .
SFX 288 0 ach .
SFX 288 0 am .
SFX 288 0 ami .
SFX 288 0 oju .
SFX 288 0 om .
SFX 288 0 oma .
SFX 288 0 ow .
SFX 288 0 owu .
SFX 288 0 u .
SFX 288 0 y .
SFX 289 Y 11
SFX 289 0 a .
SFX 289 0 ach .
SFX 289 0 am .
SFX 289 0 ami .
SFX 289 0 o .
SFX 289 0 oju .
SFX 289 0 om .
SFX 289 0 oma .
SFX 289 0 ow .
SFX 289 0 owu .
SFX 289 0 u .
SFX 290 Y 11
SFX 290 0 a .
SFX 290 0 ach .
SFX 290 0 am .
SFX 290 0 ami .
SFX 290 0 o .
SFX 290 0 oju .
SFX 290 0 om .
SFX 290 0 oma .
SFX 290 0 ow .
SFX 290 0 owu .
SFX 290 0 u .
SFX 291 Y 12
SFX 291 0 a .
SFX 291 0 ach .
SFX 291 0 am .
SFX 291 0 ami .
SFX 291 0 e .
SFX 291 0 o .
SFX 291 0 oju .
SFX 291 0 om .
SFX 291 0 oma .
SFX 291 0 ow .
SFX 291 0 owu .
SFX 291 0 u .
SFX 292 Y 12
SFX 292 0 a .
SFX 292 0 ach .
SFX 292 0 am .
SFX 292 0 ami .
SFX 292 0 e .
SFX 292 0 o .
SFX 292 0 oju .
SFX 292 0 om .
SFX 292 0 oma .
SFX 292 0 ow .
SFX 292 0 owu .
SFX 292 0 u .
SFX 293 Y 12
SFX 293 0 a .
SFX 293 0 ach .
SFX 293 0 am .
SFX 293 0 ami .
SFX 293 0 i .
SFX 293 0 o .
SFX 293 0 oju .
SFX 293 0 om .
SFX 293 0 oma .
SFX 293 0 ow .
SFX 293 0 owu .
SFX 293 0 u .
SFX 294 Y 12
SFX 294 0 a .
SFX 294 0 ach .
SFX 294 0 am .
SFX 294 0 ami .
SFX 294 0 i .
SFX 294 0 o .
SFX 294 0 oju .
SFX 294 0 om .
SFX 294 0 oma .
SFX 294 0 ow .
SFX 294 0 owu .
SFX 294 0 u .
SFX 295 Y 12
SFX 295 0 a .
SFX 295 0 ach .
SFX 295 0 am .
SFX 295 0 ami .
SFX 295 0 e .
SFX 295 0 i .
SFX 295 0 oju .
SFX 295 0 om .
SFX 295 0 oma .
SFX 295 0 ow .
SFX 295 0 owu .
SFX 295 0 u .
SFX 296 Y 12
SFX 296 0 a .
SFX 296 0 ach .
SFX 296 0 am .
SFX 296 0 ami .
SFX 296 0 e .
SFX 296 0 i .
SFX 296 0 oju .
SFX 296 0 om .
SFX 296 0 oma .
SFX 296 0 ow .
SFX 296 0 owu .
SFX 296 0 u .
SFX 297 Y 12
SFX 297 0 a .
SFX 297 0 ach .
SFX 297 0 am .
SFX 297 0 ami .
SFX 297 0 o .
SFX 297 0 oju .
SFX 297 0 om .
SFX 297 0 oma .
SFX 297 0 ow .
SFX 297 0 owu .
SFX 297 0 u .
SFX 297 0 y .
SFX 298 Y 12
SFX 298 0 a .
SFX 298 0 ach .
SFX 298 0 am .
SFX 298 0 ami .
SFX 298 0 o .
SFX 298 0 oju .
SFX 298 0 om .
SFX 298 0 oma .
SFX 298 0 ow .
SFX 298 0 owu .
SFX 298 0 u .
SFX 298 0 y .
SFX 299 Y 12
SFX 299 0 a .
SFX 299 0 ach .
SFX 299 0 am .
SFX 299 0 ami .
SFX 299 0 e .
SFX 299 0 oju .
SFX 299 0 om .
SFX 299 0 oma .
SFX 299 0 ow .
SFX 299 0 owu .
SFX 299 0 u .
SFX 299 0 y .
SFX 300 Y 12
SFX 300 0 a .
SFX 300 0 ach .
SFX 300 0 am .
SFX 300 0 ami .
SFX 300 0 e .
SFX 300 0 oju .
SFX 300 0 om .
SFX 300 0 oma .
SFX 300 0 ow .
SFX 300 0 owu .
SFX 300 0 u .
SFX 300 0 y .
SFX 301 Y 12
SFX 301 0 a .
SFX 301 0 ach .
SFX 301 0 am .
SFX 301 0 ami .
SFX 301 0 i .
SFX 301 0 oju .
SFX 301 0 om .
SFX 301 0 oma .
SFX 301 0 ow .
SFX 301 0 owu .
SFX 301 0 u .
SFX 301 0 y .
SFX 302 Y 13
SFX 302 0 a .
SFX 302 0 ach .
SFX 302 0 am .
SFX 302 0 ami .
SFX 302 0 e .
SFX 302 0 i .
SFX 302 0 o .
SFX 302 0 oju .
SFX 302 0 om .
SFX 302 0 oma .
SFX 302 0 ow .
SFX 302 0 owu .
SFX 302 0 u .
SFX 303 Y 13
SFX 303 0 a .
SFX 303 0 ach .
SFX 303 0 am .
SFX 303 0 ami .
SFX 303 0 e .
SFX 303 0 i .
SFX 303 0 o .
SFX 303 0 oju .
SFX 303 0 om .
SFX 303 0 oma .
SFX 303 0 ow .
SFX 303 0 owu .
SFX 303 0 u .
SFX 304 Y 13
SFX 304 0 a .
SFX 304 0 ach .
SFX 304 0 am .
SFX 304 0 ami .
SFX 304 0 e .
SFX 304 0 o .
SFX 304 0 oju .
SFX 304 0 om .
SFX 304 0 oma .
SFX 304 0 ow .
SFX 304 0 owu .
SFX 304 0 u .
SFX 304 0 y .
SFX 305 Y 13
SFX 305 0 a .
SFX 305 0 ach .
SFX 305 0 am .
SFX 305 0 ami .
SFX 305 0 e .
SFX 305 0 o .
SFX 305 0 oju .
SFX 305 0 om .
SFX 305 0 oma .
SFX 305 0 ow .
SFX 305 0 owu .
SFX 305 0 u .
SFX 305 0 y .
SFX 306 Y 13
SFX 306 0 a .
SFX 306 0 ach .
SFX 306 0 am .
SFX 306 0 ami .
SFX 306 0 i .
SFX 306 0 o .
SFX 306 0 oju .
SFX 306 0 om .
SFX 306 0 oma .
SFX 306 0 ow .
SFX 306 0 owu .
SFX 306 0 u .
SFX 306 0 y .
SFX 307 Y 13
SFX 307 0 a .
SFX 307 0 ach .
SFX 307 0 am .
SFX 307 0 ami .
SFX 307 0 i .
SFX 307 0 o .
SFX 307 0 oju .
SFX 307 0 om .
SFX 307 0 oma .
SFX 307 0 ow .
SFX 307 0 owu .
SFX 307 0 u .
SFX 307 0 y .
SFX 308 Y 13
SFX 308 0 a .
SFX 308 0 ach .
SFX 308 0 am .
SFX 308 0 ami .
SFX 308 0 o .
SFX 308 0 oju .
SFX 308 0 om .
SFX 308 0 oma .
SFX 308 0 ow .
SFX 308 0 owu .
SFX 308 0 u .
SFX 308 0 y .
SFX 308 0 ě .
SFX 309 Y 27
SFX 309 0 a .
SFX 309 0 ach .
SFX 309 0 am .
SFX 309 0 ami .
SFX 309 0 e .
SFX 309 0 ech .
SFX 309 0 echmej .
SFX 309 0 echmy .
SFX 309 0 echu .
SFX 309 0 eštej .
SFX 309 0 ešćo .
SFX 309 0 mej .
SFX 309 0 my .
SFX 309 0 o .
SFX 309 0 oju .
SFX 309 0 om .
SFX 309 0 oma .
SFX 309 0 omej .
SFX 309 0 omy .
SFX 309 0 otej .
SFX 309 0 ow .
SFX 309 0 owu .
SFX 309 0 ośo .
SFX 309 0 oš .
SFX 309 0 tej .
SFX 309 0 u .
SFX 309 0 ćo .
