language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
BMW-j/1,295
Bal/302
Bat/1,297
Bjert/298
Blaz/291
Brjaz/305
Brjez/1,304
Brol/291
Bryc/1,304
Bryl/302
Buź/1,292
Ból/302
Bóntk/294
Bót/1,297
Běl/1,303
Carniš/283
Chej/1,303
Chrysk/1,293
Chyl/1,303
Chót/298
Cygan/301
DIN-A4-łopjen/294
Dan/301
Dej/302
Dic/291
Dolan/278
Drab/1,297
Dubrińk/285
Dušk/294
EU-parlament/287
Fic/1,304
Fil/1,292
Forman/301
Frid/1,297
Friz/299
Fryc/1,304
Grab/301
Gras/291
Grěš/1,292
Gór/298
Górješ/283
Gółb/281
Gółub/281
Hac/291
Hal/1,303
Hans/305
Hanulk/1,293
Hanž/1,292
Hat/1,297
Hańśil/296
Hańš/291
Hańšk/294
Hol/1,303
Jopk/294
Jur/1,297
Juric/283
KZ-/1,300
Kal/1,292
Kamjeńc/299
Kap/298
Karl/291
Kej/1,303
Kil/302
Kjas/1,304
Kluč/275
Kobołtk/285
Krej/1,292
Kriš/291
Krj/1,282
Krjas/1,292
Kruž/1,304
Krystan/287
Kul/1,303
Kurj/1,292
Kuźel/296
Kónjack/294
Kłos/283
LMG-j/1,284
Lad/298
Lamk/1,293
Libuš/299
Lop/1,297
MG-j/1,295
Man/298
Mar/306
Mark/294
Matej/291
Matyj/296
Maš/1,304
Michelangel/1,292
Michl/1,295
Mjel/302
Mrozk/294
Měriš/283
Nat/298
Nazdal/296
Njeprašk/285
Palc/291
Pawl/1,303
Paš/299
Pjekł/1,297
Pjel/1,303
Pjetš/305
Pješk/294
Puj/1,292
Puž/305
Pól/302
Pěn/287
Pětš/305
Radk/1,293
Rampuś/283
Ros/1,304
Rul/296
Rych/1,297
Ryńc/299
Rěc/305
Rěz/305
Rězk/294
Saks/305
Soban/301
Stoj/291
Strjel/1,303
Syn/298
Tamil/296
Tolc/291
Ton/306
Tul/1,292
Tyc/299
Tyl/302
Tylak/285
TÜV-/1,300
U-zelez/1,297
Verdej/1,295
Wilhelm/301
Wit/298
Wituš/283
Wjelk/294
Wrobl/1,284
Wórjł/1,288
Wóś/1,292
Wěk/1,293
Wěnc/291
Wětškow/287
Zel/302
Zeln/1,307
antikśesćijan/301
awgmentatiw/287
baguett/1,288
bal/302
basbuf/1,297
batś/291
benefic/283
bibliotekaŕstw/289
biobur/301
blas/1,304
bliž/280
boml/1,303
brigadnik/285
bur/301
buźarj/1,284
bydleńk/1,290
byte/299
cejch/287
cerjadł/289
cerwišć/1,293
chach/298
chwalwopr/1,288
co/305
coach/281
dalokostudij/283
dekaedr/1,288
diaprojektor/287
dn/1,308
dnj/1,282
doběg/285
doswěźenj/1,284
dosć/296
drustw/289
duš/279
elektrometr/1,288
eyeliner/287
firnis/283
fonometr/1,288
forman/301
frame/299
fres/279
gas/279
glědanick/1,290
gondolier/1,288
grajk/1,293
gram/287
gran/301
griwack/285
groz/279
grěšnistw/289
gueriller/1,297
góspodowarj/1,284
hennakrj/1,282
huntš/1,304
islamizm/287
jabłucysk/1,290
jaj/294
jazorišć/1,293
kadr/1,288
kanibal/296
kanumejstaŕstw/289
katastr/1,288
kepij/1,284
kic/299
klěbk/285
kod/1,288
kodeks/283
kokakrj/1,282
koł/298
krj/1,282
krjuz/279
krotkowulicowańk/1,290
kubłaństw/289
kólej/296
kórban/287
kłoskarj/1,284
kśesćijan/301
kśic/279
kšas/279
kšetowišć/1,293
lanisk/1,290
lel/1,292
lomk/285
lěs/305
lětadł/289
masl/1,303
maz/299
miliamper/1,288
mountainbik/1,286
mozes/283
musterowarj/1,284
młoźeństw/289
nacij/1,295
nakósn/1,277
nan/301
nazběrak/285
nazymn/1,277
njebóžatk/1,290
njedospołn/1,277
njedosć/296
njedr/298
njerěš/280
njespódobn/1,277
njewuměrn/1,277
njezbóž/1,297
njezmiln/1,277
nocturne/299
ocon/287
oktobr/1,288
pac/279
parasol/296
pasaŕstw/289
penaltyj/1,284
plac/305
policaj/296
powjesk/285
proc/279
promušk/1,290
pseudomanewr/1,288
pychotaŕstw/289
pócarn/1,277
pódnapis/283
pódton/287
pógrěbnišć/1,293
pógósćinarj/1,284
pómódr/1,277
pótucn/1,277
pěrsing/285
płonic/299
pśebejn/1,277
pśemudr/1,277
pśepas/309
pśezpołdnj/1,290
pśipas/309
pśiraźowarj/1,284
pśěźeńc/305
remak/1,286
riz/305
rolnikaŕstw/289
rulkowanišć/1,293
rěc/280
sadukubłarj/1,284
semestr/1,288
shak/1,286
skrupl/1,295
smaslak/285
smjejkotańk/1,290
smutj/1,295
socialtiket/287
spódobn/1,277
srěš/280
stal/296
starowóśc/299
stere/1,304
studij/302
studnistw/289
stwóriśel/283
sukn/294
suš/280
swěśetk/1,290
słomišć/1,293
słyńc/1,304
tentakl/1,295
timbr/1,288
tuž/279
tyźenj/1,284
tśutś/1,303
tšugałk/1,290
wandal/296
welin/287
woblět/298
wobsednikojstw/289
wokeńc/1,304
wokšomk/285
wrjeśenc/1,304
wrobletk/1,290
wuběgowanišć/1,293
wugl/1,295
wumucn/1,277
wuśišć/276
wótbocn/1,277
wótlodowarj/1,284
wěc/280
yog/1,286
zanan/301
zarucaństw/289
zastajeńc/283
zbóžk/1,290
zběranišć/1,293
zeźaržowak/285
změrn/1,277
zwónjeńc/299
Ławr/1,297
łožyšk/1,290
łuž/279
Śelk/294
śěž/279
Šleź/1,292
Šwěl/1,303
šal/296
šmul/302
šnicl/1,284
špachtl/1,295
źiśestw/289
źěł/298
žyceńk/1,290
